Hawaii statutes.
[§658A-25] Judgment on award; attorney's
fees and litigation expenses. (a) Upon granting an order confirming,
vacating without directing a rehearing, modifying, or correcting an award, the
court shall enter a judgment in conformity therewith. The judgment may be
recorded, docketed, and enforced as any other judgment in a civil action.

(b) A court may allow reasonable costs of the
motion and subsequent judicial proceedings.

(c) On application of a prevailing party to a
contested judicial proceeding under section 658A-22, 658A-23, or 658A-24, the
court may add reasonable attorney's fees and other reasonable expenses of
litigation incurred in a judicial proceeding after the award is made to a
judgment confirming, vacating without directing a rehearing, modifying, or
correcting an award. [L 2001, c 265, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Subsection (a), which enumerates the appeals that may be
taken from a court order concerning an arbitration proceeding, does not
represent an exclusive list of appealable orders; thus, although not listed in
subsection (a), order compelling arbitration was sufficiently final under the
collateral order doctrine to be appealable under §641-1. 129 H. 378, 301 P.3d
588 (2013).

Under subsection (c), union-appellant, representative of real
party in interest city worker, was not entitled to an award of attorney's fees
incurred during a proceeding filed against worker's employer to enforce an
uncontested judgment confirming an arbitration award. 119 H. 201 (App.), 194
P.3d 1163 (2008).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next